Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.045

Retention of counsel by legislature—Notice—Representation in absence of notice.

The legislature may employ or retain counsel of its own choosing. However, the legislature shall notify the attorney general whenever it makes a decision to use the services of such counsel to represent it or any of its members in a particular judicial or administrative proceeding. With respect to any such proceeding where the legislature has not so notified the attorney general, the attorney general shall represent the legislature until so notified. For purposes of this section, "legislature" means the senate and house of representatives together. The major purposes of this section are to confirm and implement in statute law the constitutional power of the legislative branch to select its own counsel.

[ 1986 c 323 s 1.]